Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3545
Professional geologist; licensure; application; eligibility, license issued outside of the state.

(1) An individual who holds a valid license issued outside of the State of Nebraska to engage in the practice of geology may apply to the board to be licensed as a professional geologist.

(2) The following are required for an applicant to be eligible for licensure by the board as a professional geologist under this section:

(a) The applicant has a documented record of four or more years of progressive experience in geologic work of a grade and character which indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to practice geology. Such progressive experience shall have been completed after graduating from a geology or geologic specialty program with a minimum of thirty semester hours or forty-five quarter hours of course work in geology that includes course work in the content domains and hours as prescribed by the board;

(b) The applicant has passed the examination on the fundamentals of geology or a similar examination that is approved by the board;

(c) The applicant has passed the examination on the practice of geology or a similar examination that is approved by the board;

(d) The applicant has passed an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska;

(e) The applicant has submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board;

(f) The applicant has submitted one or more acceptable written references;

(g) The applicant has provided verification of licensure in good standing in another jurisdiction; and

(h) The jurisdiction where the applicant is licensed has laws that are consistent with the Geologists Regulation Act.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 35.